Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1364.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 201 and 202 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, are amended to read:Section 201. Leases for Not More Than Three Years.--[Real] Subject to section 207, real property, including any personal property thereon, may be leased for a term of not more than three years by a landlord or his agent to a tenant or his agent, by oral or written contract or agreement.Section 202. Leases for More Than Three Years.--[Real] 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Subject to section 207, real property, including any personal property thereon, may be leased for a term of more than three years by a landlord to a tenant or by their respective agents lawfully authorized in writing. Any such lease must be in writing and signed by the parties making or creating the same, otherwise it shall have the force and effect of a lease at will only and shall not be given any greater force or effect either in law or equity, notwithstanding any consideration therefor, unless the tenancy has continued for more than one year and the landlord and tenant have recognized its rightful existence by claiming and admitting liability for the rent, in which case the tenancy shall become one from year to year.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 207. Notice of Building Credit through Rent Reporting Program for Residential Leases.-- (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a lease made under section 201 or 202 for an individual dwelling unit on residential property with a landlord or a landlord's agent which is required to establish a building credit through rent reporting program under Article II-A shall include written notice of the program in a form prescribed under Article II-A and a written receipt of notice that shall be signed by the tenant or the tenant's agent at the time of entering the lease regardless of the tenant's eligibility for the program.(b) Written notice and signed receipt are required under subsection (a) whether the lease is oral or written and does not depend on the duration of the term of the lease.(c) Unless otherwise required by law or the program established by a landlord or the landlord's agent, when a landlord or the landlord's agent is in possession of a receipt 20260SB1364PN1779 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of notice signed by a tenant or the tenant's agent, no additional receipt of notice is required at the time of entering or renewal of the subsequent and consecutive lease if the subsequent and consecutive lease is for the same individual dwelling unit with a term of equal duration entered or renewed automatically or by reconstitution or holdover.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dwelling unit" means a portion of real property, including any personal property, designated for a separate occupancy, the boundaries of which are determined by a landlord subject to the terms of the lease. The term does not include a portion of real property or space owned by a landlord and subject to lease for the placement of a home owned by a tenant."Program" means a building credit through rent reporting program established by a landlord under Article II-A."Written notice" means any writing by hand or typed, including an electronic communication if the electronic communication is sent to an email address specified by the receiving party.Section 3. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE II-A.REPORTING RENT PAYMENT INFORMATIONTO CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY PROGRAM.Section 201-A. Scope of article.This article provides for the reporting of a tenant's on-time rent payment information to consumer reporting agencies through an opt-in program offered by the landlord or the landlord's agent to a tenant leasing an individual dwelling unit of real 20260SB1364PN1779 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property, including personal property within the property, for residential purposes.Section 202-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committee." The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee."Consumer reporting agency." As follows:(1) An entity:(i) as defined under 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p) (relating to definitions; rules of construction); or(ii) as defined under 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(f) so long as the consumer reporting agency resells or otherwise furnishes rental payment information to a nationwide consumer reporting agency as defined under 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p).(2) The term includes, but is not limited to, a credit reporting agency or third-party vendor that reports rent payments to a nationwide consumer reporting agency as described under paragraph (1)."Dwelling unit." A portion of the real property, including any personal property, designated for separate occupancy, the boundaries of which are determined by the landlord and subject to the terms of the lease. The term does not include a portion of real property or space owned by a landlord and subject to lease for the placement of a home owned by a tenant."Eligible tenant." A tenant:(1) Who has a lease with a landlord for a residential dwelling unit.(2) Whose lease complies with section 201 or 202.20260SB1364PN1779 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Whose name appears on the lease."Landlord." A person or a person's agent that owns 15 or more leased individual dwelling units for residential purposes. The leased units may be situated in one or more locations and may be contained in single or multiple structured sites. All residential properties that the landlord has 50% or more ownership or 50% or more stock holdings in the owner of the real property or any subsidiary or parent entity of the landlord, shall be included when determining the number of individual dwelling units leased by the landlord."Opt-in" or "opt into." A mechanism that requires a tenant to take an affirmative action to provide consent to join or take part in a program."Person." A natural person, corporation, partnership, association, trust, other entity or any combination thereof."Positive rent payment." Payment of rent by a tenant to a landlord in full on or before the due date as required under the terms of a lease."Program." A building credit through rent reporting program established by a landlord under section 203-A."Rent payment information." Information concerning a tenant's timely payment of rent and fees. The term includes fees that may be included at a landlord's sole discretion which are specified in the terms of the lease, including late rent payment fees and costs or services related to the occupancy of the individual dwelling unit, such as garbage collection, fee for participation in the program or other pass-through billing."Third-party vendor." An entity that contracts with a landlord to provide the technology capabilities and opt-in platforms that furnish data of a tenant's positive rent payment 20260SB1364PN1779 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to at least one nationwide consumer reporting agency."Written election." A communication of election of a tenant that may be handwritten, typed, electronic or in another manner that is not oral if the election clearly identifies the sending party and intent of the sending party."Written notice." A notice that is handwritten, typed or an electronic communication if the electronic communication is sent to the email address specified by the receiving party.Section 203-A. Establishment.(a) Opt-in program .--Except as provided under subsection (b), within six months of the effective date of this subsection, a landlord shall establish an opt-in program to allow an eligible tenant to request and consent to positive rent payment information reporting to a consumer reporting agency. The following shall apply:(1) The landlord, in the landlord's sole discretion, shall submit or hire a third-party vendor to submit a tenant's positive rent payment information to at least one consumer reporting agency.(2) After establishment of the program, all tenants shall be provided a copy of the requirements to participate in the program.(3) A standard form developed under section 207-A must be provided to all tenants at the time of entering a lease for a residential dwelling unit under sections 201 and 202.(4) Any time after tenancy occurs, a tenant may request the standard form under section 207-A. If a tenant requests a standard form, the form shall be provided to the tenant within five days of the request.(5) To participate in the program, a tenant must:20260SB1364PN1779 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Be an eligible tenant.(ii) Submit a written election.(b) Exceptions.--(1) The requirement under subsection (a) shall not apply to a landlord who offers to a tenant positive rent payment reporting to a consumer reporting agency prior to the effective date of subsection (a).(2) This subsection shall not apply if the landlord discontinues a positive rent payment reporting program established prior to the effective date of subsection (a).Section 204-A. Notice.Within 30 days of the establishment of a program under section 203-A, a landlord shall provide written notice of the establishment of the program to each of the tenants named on a lease and post the information:(1) On a publicly accessible Internet website of the landlord, if applicable.(2) At any locations in which in-person rent payments are accepted.Section 205-A. Offer of rent reporting.(a) Participation .--A landlord shall offer to all eligible tenants the option to participate in the program in accordance with all requirements under this article.(b) Contents of offer.--Each eligible tenant shall receive an offer to opt into the program that contains the following information:(1) The eligible tenant's participation in the program is voluntary.(2) To participate in the program, the eligible tenant must submit a written election.20260SB1364PN1779 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) At any time, an eligible tenant may withdraw from participation in the program by submitting a written election to withdraw.(4) The name of the consumer reporting agency to which the eligible tenant's rent payment information will be submitted.(5) In accordance with section 208-A(a), the fee, if any, that will be charged to the eligible tenant to participate in the program.(6) The address to which an eligible tenant shall submit a required written election.(7) Failure to pay a fee charged for an eligible tenant to participate in the program shall result in removal from the program.(8) An eligible tenant's written election to withdraw from the program after participation was elected shall prohibit participation in the program by the withdrawing tenant for six months after the election to withdraw occurs.(c) Standard form.--A copy of the standard form developed under section 207-A shall be affixed to the offer to opt into the program.Section 206-A. Acceptance.(a) Authorization .--Except as provided in subsection (b), an eligible tenant may opt in at any time after notification of the availability of the program. The offer to provide a written election to opt in does not expire and shall not need to be accepted at the time of offer.(b) Exception.--An offer may not be accepted if a tenant is not an eligible tenant or if the eligible tenant owes past due rent or fees under the terms of the lease.20260SB1364PN1779 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 207-A. Standard form.The Bureau of Consumer Protection within the Office of Attorney General shall develop a standard form for completion by an eligible tenant with an affixed signature block that the eligible tenant shall date and sign to accept the offer of rent payment information reporting. The standard form shall include the contents of the offer required under section 205-A(b) and any other information the landlord includes to assist an eligible tenant with participating in the program and efforts to build a positive credit history responsibly, including the availability of financial education courses and online solutions to learn more about data accuracy, transparency and consumer data control and dispute rights under the law.Section 208-A. Fees.(a) Authorization .--When an eligible tenant elects to participate in the program, a landlord may require the eligible tenant to pay a fee prior to participation and monthly thereafter as a condition of participation in the program.(b) Amount of fee.--A fee charged under subsection (a) shall be equal to the actual cost required to submit data to a consumer reporting agency, or $5, whichever is less.(c) Failure to pay fee.--(1) The failure to pay a fee charged under this section:(i) Shall be grounds for removal of a tenant from the program in accordance with paragraph (3).(ii) May not be a cause for termination of tenancy under the terms of the lease.(2) Any unpaid fee under this section:(i) May not be deducted from a tenant's security deposit.20260SB1364PN1779 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Shall be collectable as money past due.(3) If the fee remains unpaid for 30 days or more, an eligible tenant shall be deemed as terminating participation in the program and may be removed from the program.Section 209-A. Withdrawal, removal and discontinuance of the program.(a) Withdrawal.--A tenant may withdraw from participation in the program at any time by submitting a written election to withdraw from the program to the tenant's landlord or a third-party vendor that administers the program for a landlord. If a written election to withdraw is received after reporting of rent payment information has occurred for the reporting period, the withdrawal shall begin the reporting period immediately following receipt.(b) Removal from program.--(1) An eligible tenant shall be removed from the program when the tenant:(i) is no longer an eligible tenant; or(ii) fails to pay the fee required under section 208-A.(2) An eligible tenant that is removed from the program under this subsection may be barred from electing to participate in the program for a period of one year after removal.(3) An eligible tenant who holds rent in an escrow account for legal cause:(i) May not be removed from the program.(ii) Shall not be in violation of withholding a required fee under section 208-A.(c) Discontinuance.--If at any time a landlord no longer 20260SB1364PN1779 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meets the requirements of a landlord under this article, the landlord may discontinue the program in its entirety. Written notice of the discontinuance of the program shall be provided to all tenants participating in the program. Fees related to the program may not be charged to the tenant from the date of discontinuance. Within five days of discontinuance of the program, unused or prepaid fees shall be refunded to the tenant who paid the fees.Section 210-A. Third-party vendor contracts.A landlord may contract with a third-party vendor that specializes in rent reporting to meet the requirements of this article.Section 211-A. Duties of committee.(a) Data review.--The committee shall:(1) Develop a rubric for data review of the outcomes of the program.(2) Develop criteria to measure the effectiveness of the program.(3) Request information that is not protected from disclosure from State and local agencies for the report required under subsection (b).(4) Request information or input from individuals, groups or organizations within the industry that have a purpose related to tenant's or landlord rights to develop the rubric, determine effectiveness of the program and to make findings or recommendations.(b) Report.--Every four years, the committee shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development 20260SB1364PN1779 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Committee of the House of Representatives a report on:(1) The impact of the program on credit visibility.(2) Public policy effects of the program.Section 4. This act shall take effect in six months.20260SB1364PN1779 - 12 - 1234